Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Chapter 6.2. Public School Teacher Supplemental Retirement.

§ 51.1-617.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Board”
means the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System.

“Eligible employee”
means any turnaround specialist or member of the middle school teacher corps providing services for a participating public school division pursuant to subsections E and F of § 22.1-199.1.

“Participating employer”
means any local public school board that offers and pays the costs of improved retirement benefits as described in subsections E and F of § 22.1-199.1.

“Plan”
means the defined contribution plan established pursuant to this chapter and the provisions of § 401 (a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

“Qualified participant”
means an eligible employee of a participating employer.

History.

2004, c. 436; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “subsections E and F” for “subsections F and G” in the definitions for “Eligible employee” and “Participating employer.”

§ 51.1-618.
Defined contribution plan for eligible employees of local public school boards; administered by the Board.

The Board shall establish and administer a defined contribution plan for eligible employees. The Director of the Virginia Retirement System shall be the chief administrative officer of the plan. The Board may contract with private corporations or institutions subject to the standards set forth in §

51.1-124.30

to provide investment products as well as any other goods and services related to the administration of the plan. The Virginia Retirement System is hereby authorized to perform related services including, but not limited to, providing consolidated billing, individual and collective recordkeeping and accountings, and asset purchase, control, and safekeeping.

If it deems it advisable, the Board may create a trust or other special fund for the segregation of the funds or assets resulting from contributions made on behalf of qualified participants.

Participating employers shall be responsible for setting the contribution rate for their eligible employees and timely transferring contributions to the private corporation or institution designated by the Board pursuant to subsection A.

History.

2004, c. 436; 2008, c. 245.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 245 deleted former subsection D, limiting liability of the Commonwealth, and the Board of Trustees, the employees of, and the Advisory Committee of the Retirement System.